Utah statutes.
7-8-21.   Application of chapter to industrial loan companies.
(1)  As used in this section, "industrial loan company" is a person that on
March 17, 2004, is:
(a)  authorized to conduct business under this chapter; and
(b)  not authorized to hold or receive deposits.
(2)  An industrial loan company may operate as an industrial bank under this
chapter except that the industrial loan company:
(a)  may not hold or receive deposits without:
(i)  the prior written approval of the commissioner; and
(ii)  obtaining insurance from the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or a
successor federal deposit insurance entity;
(b)  may not engage in any conduct authorized by this title that is
conditioned on the industrial loan company being a depository institution
without meeting the conditions described in Subsections (2)(a)(i) and (ii);
and
(c)  may not use a term listed in Subsection 7-1-701(3) in its name without
meeting the conditions described in Subsections (2)(a)(i) and (ii).
(3)  If a person is not authorized to conduct business under this chapter on
March 17, 2004, that person may not be considered an industrial loan company
under this section.
